Maine, session 132, LD513.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §1002, sub-§1, ¶A-1, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 242, §2, is
amended to read:
A-1. "Stipend employee" means a person who receives limited monetary payment or
benefits, through a series of payments or in a lump sum, for personal services
performed in an advisory, mentoring or coaching capacity for a school administrative
unit.
This paragraph is repealed July 1, 2028.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §1002, sub-§2, ¶B is enacted to read:
B. A school board may permit the spouse of a member of the school board to serve as
a stipend employee on a contractual basis when that action is in the best interest of
students and a summation of potential conflicts of interest is documented and steps to
mitigate potential risks or negative outcomes are described in the signed contract. A
school board may adopt a written policy on nepotism that includes hiring practices for
school-sanctioned stipend positions, discourages favoritism and political patronage,
considers the needs of the school system and provides that all qualified applicants have
a fair and equal opportunity to be selected on merit, with priority selection
consideration given to the best interest of students without restrictions based solely on
family association.
This paragraph is repealed July 1, 2028.
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §1002, sub-§2-C is enacted to read:
2-C. Permissive volunteer placement by school administrative unit, school union,
academy. Notwithstanding subsection 2-A, a school board may permit a school board
member's spouse to serve as a volunteer. A school board may adopt a written policy on
nepotism to discourage favoritism and political patronage, consider the needs of the school
system and provide that all volunteers have a fair and equal opportunity to be selected on
merit, with priority consideration given to the best interest of students without restrictions
based solely on family association.
This subsection is repealed July 1, 2028.